Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2889, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2889. Homesteads, as defined in Section 2888 of this


title, are hereby classified for the purpose of taxation as provided


in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution. All


homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the same as


other real property therein, except that each homestead, as defined


by Section 2801 et seq. of this title, shall be exempted from all


forms of ad valorem taxation to the extent of One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00) of the assessed valuation.





Req. No. 3241 Page 1


A. Beginning with tax year 2027 and thereafter, every homestead


qualified under the laws of this state shall be entitled to an


exemption from ad valorem taxation as follows:


1. For tax year 2027: an amount equal to thirty-three and one-


third percent (33 1/3%) of the full assessed value of the homestead;


2. For tax year 2028: an amount equal to sixty-six and two-


thirds percent (66 2/3%) of the full assessed value of the


homestead; and


3. For tax year 2029 and all subsequent tax years: an amount


equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the full assessed value of


the homestead.


B. The exemption shall be the greater of any current exemption


for homesteads or that provided in subsection A and shall apply


uniformly to every qualifying homestead within the state and shall


supersede any lesser exemption provided by prior law.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027, and


shall first apply to ad valorem taxes payable in calendar year 2027.




60-2-3241 QD 1/15/2026 8:28:13 AM











Req. No. 3241 Page 2